Utah statutes.
38-4-4.   Unclaimed shipments -- Delivery to warehouseman.
Whenever any railroad company or other common carrier, except an express
company, shall have transported any baggage or freight to the place of
consignment within this state, and the owner, consignee or person entitled to
receive the same shall omit, for the period of sixty days after the arrival of
the baggage or freight at the place of consignment, to accept and remove the
same and pay the charges thereon, it shall be lawful for such carrier to
deliver such freight for storage to some person or company conducting the
business of storing goods, subject to the charges thereon for transportation,
storage by the carrier and conveyance and drayage to the place of storage,
accompanied by a copy of the bill of lading in case of freight, or, in case of
baggage, by a statement of the place from which, and the place to which, such
baggage was transported, together with the check numbers; and any carrier
whose route reaches into this state may collect and store as aforesaid at any
station in this state the unclaimed freight from all or any points or stations
on its line within this state.
